Washington statutes.
RCW 10.37.110

Larceny or embezzlement—Specification.

In an indictment or information for larceny or embezzlement of money, bank notes, certificates of stock, or valuable securities, or for a conspiracy to cheat or defraud a person of any such property, it is sufficient to allege the larceny or embezzlement, or the conspiracy to cheat and defraud, to be of money, bank notes, certificates of stock, or valuable securities, without specifying the coin, number, denomination or kind thereof.

[ 1891 c 28 s 38; Code 1881 s 1023; RRS s 2074.]

NOTES:

Larceny: Chapter 9A.56 RCW.

Ownership of property, proof of: RCW 10.58.060.